Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,146
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-8,146 to 79-8,154 shall be known and may be cited as the Teach in Nebraska Today Act.

Laws 2022, LB1218, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB1284, § 5.
April 17, 2024